Massachusetts, session 194th, S1553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25B of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “New technology”, and inserting in
place thereof the following definition:-
''New technology'', equipment such as magnetic resonance imagers and linear
accelerators, as may be defined by the department, or a service, as may be defined by the
department, which for reasons of quality, access or cost is determined to be new technology by
the department; provided, however, that computerized tomography and any equipment that is
widely utilized as standard diagnostic, treatment or therapeutic technology shall not be
considered new technology.
of 1